Nebraska, session 109, LB497.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB497 LB497
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-215, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-215 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a student
is a resident of the school district where he or she resides and shall be
admitted to any such school district upon request without charge.
(2) A school board shall admit a student upon request without charge
if at least one of the student's parents resides in the school district.
(3) A school board shall admit any homeless student upon request
without charge if the district is the district in which the student (a)
is currently located, (b) attended when permanently housed, or (c) was
last enrolled.
(4) A school board may allow a student whose residency in the
district ceases during a school year to continue attending school in such
district for the remainder of that school year.
(5) A school board may admit nonresident students to the school
district pursuant to a contract with the district where the student is a
resident and shall collect tuition pursuant to the contract.
(6) A school board may admit nonresident students to the school
district pursuant to the enrollment option program as authorized by
sections 79-232 to 79-246, and such admission shall be without charge.
(7) In order to carry out the provisions of section 79-2201, a
school board shall permit children of military families to enroll
preliminarily in a school district if a parent presents evidence of
military orders that the military family will be stationed in this state
during the current or following school year. A student of a military
family shall be admitted to the school district without charge upon
arrival in Nebraska if the requirements of this section are met.
(8) A school board may admit a student who is a resident of another
state to the school district and collect tuition in advance at a rate
determined by the school board.
(9) When a student as a ward of the state or as a ward of any court
-2-

LB497 LB497
2025 2025
(a) has been placed in a school district other than the district in which
he or she resided at the time he or she became a ward and such ward does
not reside in a foster family home licensed or approved by the Department
of Health and Human Services or a foster home maintained or used pursuant
to section 83-108.04 or (b) has been placed in any institution which
maintains a special education program which has been approved by the
State Department of Education and such institution is not owned or
operated by the district in which he or she resided at the time he or she
became a ward, the cost of his or her education and the required
transportation costs associated with the student's education shall be
paid by the state, but not in advance, to the receiving school district
or approved institution under rules and regulations prescribed by the
Department of Health and Human Services and the student shall remain a
resident of the district in which he or she resided at the time he or she
became a ward. Any student who is a ward of the state or a ward of any
court who resides in a foster family home licensed or approved by the
Department of Health and Human Services or a foster home maintained or
used pursuant to section 83-108.04 shall be deemed a resident of the
district in which he or she resided at the time he or she became a foster
child, unless it is determined under section 43-1311 or 43-1312 that he
or she will not attend such district in which case he or she shall be
deemed a resident of the district in which the foster family home or
foster home is located.
(10)(a) When a student is not a ward of the state or a ward of any
court and is residing in a residential setting located in Nebraska for
reasons other than to receive an education and the residential setting is
operated by a service provider which is certified or licensed by the
Department of Health and Human Services or is enrolled in the medical
assistance program established pursuant to the Medical Assistance Act and
Title XIX or XXI of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, the
student shall remain a resident of the district in which he or she
-3-

LB497 LB497
2025 2025
resided immediately prior to residing in such residential setting. The
resident district for a student who is not a ward of the state or a ward
of any court does not change when the student moves from one residential
setting to another.
(b) If a student is residing in a residential setting as described
in subdivision (10)(a) of this section and such residential setting does
not maintain an interim-program school as defined in section 79-1119.01
or an approved or accredited school, the resident school district shall
contract with the district in which such residential setting is located
for the provision of all educational services, including all special
education services and support services as defined in section 79-1125.01,
unless a parent or guardian and the resident school district agree that
an appropriate education will be provided by the resident school district
while the student is residing in such residential setting. If the
resident school district is required to contract, the district in which
such residential setting is located shall contract with the resident
district and provide all educational services, including all special
education services, to the student. If the two districts cannot agree on
the amount of the contract, the State Department of Education shall
determine the amount to be paid by the resident district to the district
in which such residential setting is located based on the needs of the
student, approved special education rates, the department's general
experience with special education budgets, and the cost per student in
the district in which such residential setting is located. Once the
contract has been entered into, all legal responsibility for special
education and related services shall be transferred to the school
district in which the residential setting is located.
(c) If a student is residing in a residential setting as described
in subdivision (10)(a) of this section and such residential setting
maintains an interim-program school as defined in section 79-1119.01 or
an approved or accredited school, the department shall reimburse such
-4-

LB497 LB497
2025 2025
residential setting for the provision of all educational services,
including all special education services and support services, with the
amount of payment for all educational services determined pursuant to the
average per pupil cost of the service agency as defined in section
79-1116. The resident school district shall retain responsibility for
such student's individualized education plan, if any. The educational
services may be provided through (i) such interim-program school or
approved or accredited school, (ii) a contract between the residential
setting and the school district in which such residential setting is
located, (iii) a contract between the residential setting and another
service agency as defined in section 79-1124, or (iv) a combination of
such educational service providers.
(d) If a school district pays a school district in which a
residential setting is located for educational services provided pursuant
to subdivision (10)(b) of this section and it is later determined that a
different school district was the resident school district for such
student at the time such educational services were provided, the school
district that was later determined to be the resident school district
shall reimburse the school district that initially paid for the
educational services one hundred ten percent of the amount paid.
(e) A student residing in a residential setting described in this
subsection shall be defined as a student with a handicap pursuant to
Article VII, section 11, of the Constitution of Nebraska, and as such the
state and any political subdivision may contract with institutions not
wholly owned or controlled by the state or any political subdivision to
provide the educational services to the student if such educational
services are nonsectarian in nature.
(11) A school board shall admit a student who is also enrolled (a)
in a private, denominational, or parochial school or (b) in a school
which elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to meet accreditation or
approval requirements, without charge for part-time enrollment in the
-5-

LB497 LB497
2025 2025
school district for purposes of participation in extracurricular
activities in accordance with section 79-2,136 if the school district
where such student or such student's parent resides does not offer the
extracurricular activity in which the student desires to participate
through part-time enrollment and the school district in which the student
is attempting to attend part-time pursuant to section 79-2,136, is the
closest school district to where such student or such student's parent
resides that offers such extracurricular activity.
(12) (11) In the case of any individual eighteen years of age or
younger who is a ward of the state or any court and who is placed in a
county detention home established under section 43-2,110, the cost of his
or her education shall be paid by the state, regardless of the district
in which he or she resided at the time he or she became a ward, to the
agency or institution which: (a) Is selected by the county board with
jurisdiction over such detention home; (b) has agreed or contracted with
such county board to provide educational services; and (c) has been
approved by the State Department of Education pursuant to rules and
regulations prescribed by the State Board of Education.
(13) (12) No tuition shall be charged for students who may be by law
allowed to attend the school without charge.
(14) (13) The State Department of Education shall establish
procedures and criteria for collecting enrollment, admission, and related
information needed for any student to attend a school district in this
state which shall include, but not be limited to, having an adult with
legal or actual charge or control of a student provide through electronic
means or other means specified by the department the name of the student,
the name of the adult with legal or actual charge or control of the
student, the address where the student is or will be residing, and
information on how and where the adult may generally be reached during
the school day.
(15) (14) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
-6-

LB497 LB497
2025 2025
regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 2. Section 79-2,136, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2,136 (1) Each school board shall allow the part-time enrollment
of students, for all courses selected by the students, who are residents
of, or admitted to, the school district pursuant to subsection
subsections (1), and (2), or (11) of section 79-215 and who are also
enrolled in a private, denominational, or parochial school or in a school
which elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to meet accreditation or
approval requirements and shall establish policies and procedures for
such part-time enrollment. Such policies and procedures may include
provisions permitting the part-time enrollment of such students who are
not residents of, or admitted to, such school districts to the extent
permitted pursuant to section 79-215 and may require part-time students
to follow school policies that apply to other students at any time the
part-time student is present on school grounds or at a school-sponsored
activity or athletic event. Part-time enrollment shall not entitle a
student to transportation or transportation reimbursements pursuant to
section 79-611.
(2) Each school board shall establish policies and procedures to
allow any student who is a resident of, or admitted to, the school
district pursuant to subsection (1), or (2), or (11) of section 79-215
and who is enrolled in a school which elects pursuant to section 79-1601
not to meet accreditation or approval requirements to participate in any
extracurricular activities as defined in section 79-2,126, including, but
not limited to, interschool competitions, to the same extent and subject
to the same requirements, conditions, and procedures as a student
enrolled in a public school governed by such board, except that any
school which elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to meet accreditation
or approval requirements shall set the standards for satisfactory
academic performance for a student from the school to participate in
-7-

LB497 LB497
2025 2025
extracurricular activities pursuant to this subsection and shall provide
assurances of compliance with such academic standards.
(3) School board policies and procedures adopted pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section (a) shall require any student desiring to
participate participating in extracurricular activities pursuant to such
subsection to be enrolled in no more and no less than five credit hours
offered by the school district in any semester in order to participate,
but may not prohibit a student from enrolling in more than five credit
hours, (b) shall not allow any preference in the selection of a student
for participation in an extracurricular activity based on such student's
status as a full-time student in the school district, and (c) may require
any student participating in extracurricular activities pursuant to such
subsection to follow school policies that apply to other students when
present on school grounds or at a school-sponsored activity or athletic
event. Participation in extracurricular activities pursuant to subsection
(2) of this section shall not entitle a student to transportation, except
to and from practices and events to the same extent as public school
students participating in such activities, or transportation
reimbursement pursuant to section 79-611.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to exempt any student
from the compulsory attendance provisions of section sections 79-201 or
any statutes relating to habitual truancy to 79-210.
Sec. 3. Original sections 79-215 and 79-2,136, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-8-